Utah statutes.
58-64-601.   Deception detection instruments.

(1)  Instruments used in performing deception detection shall be those that are generally recognized in the profession.

(2)  An instrument used for deception detection shall have a permanent recording produced by the instrument for objective analysis by the examiner, the division, or the board.

(3)  A written interpretation by an examiner while conducting a deception detection examination does not satisfy the requirements of a permanent recording.



Enacted by Chapter 215, 1995 General Session

